Maryland, session 2026, SB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), (f), and (g) of this section, each public
school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1004*

SENATE BILL 1004
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day; and
(3) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to meet
the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(c) (1) The following days are public school holidays:
(i) Thanksgiving Day and the day after;
(ii) Christmas Eve and from then through January 1;
(iii) Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;
(iv) Presidents’ Day;
(v) The Friday before Easter and from then through the Monday
after Easter;
(vi) Memorial Day; and
(vii) Primary and general election days.
(2) If the federal and State observances of a holiday are on different days,
the board of education of each county shall determine which date shall be the date of
observance for the public schools within the county.
(3) The public schools shall devote a part of at least one day to appropriate
exercises for each of the following:
(i) Washington’s Birthday;
(ii) Lincoln’s Birthday;
(iii) Veterans’ Day;
(iv) Columbus Day;
(v) Arbor Day;

SENATE BILL 1004 3
(vi) Black History Month, with an emphasis on Harriet Tubman and
Frederick Douglass and the contributions they made in the fight against slavery; and
(vii) Any other day of national significance.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the public schools,
in the following counties, may remain open and in session on primary and general election
days:
(i) Calvert;
(ii) Caroline;
(iii) Dorchester;
(iv) Kent;
(v) Talbot; and
(vi) Worcester.
(5) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE
HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL CLOSE PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE
COUNTY FOR STUDENT ATTENDANCE ONLY TO OBSERVE THE FOLLOWING
HOLIDAYS:
1. THE FIRST DAY ONLY OF:
A. DIWALI;
B. EID AL–ADHA;
C. EID AL–FITR;
D. LUNAR NEW YEAR; AND
E. ROSH HASHANAH;
2. YOM KIPPUR; AND
3. JUNETEENTH.

SENATE BILL 1004
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.